North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-03.1 Uniform Controlled Substances Act
19-03.1-39.
Education and research.

The board shall carry out educational programs designed to prevent and deter misuse of controlled substances. In connection with these programs it may:

Promote better recognition of the problems of misuse and abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and among interested groups and organizations.

Assist the regulated industry and interested groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

Consult with interested groups and organizations to aid them in solving administrative and organizational problems.

Evaluate procedures, projects, techniques, and controls conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

Disseminate the results of research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of what problems exist and what can be done to combat them.

Assist in the education and training of state and local law enforcement officials in their efforts to control misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

The board shall encourage research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with the research, and in furtherance of the enforcement of this chapter, it may:

Establish methods to assess accurately the effects of controlled substances and identify and characterize those with potential for abuse.

Make studies and undertake programs of research to:

Develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment, and devices to strengthen the enforcement of this chapter.

Determine patterns of misuse and abuse of controlled substances and the social effects thereof.

Improve methods for preventing, predicting, understanding, and dealing with the misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

Enter contracts with public agencies, institutions of higher education, and private organizations or individuals for the purpose of conducting research, demonstrations, or special projects which bear directly on misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

The board may enter into contracts for educational and research activities without performance bonds and without regard to statutory provisions affecting such contracts.

The board may authorize persons engaged in research on the use and effects of controlled substances to withhold the names and other identifying characteristics of individuals who are the subjects of the research. Persons who obtain this authorization are not compelled in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding to identify the individuals who are the subjects of research for which the authorization was obtained.

The board may authorize the possession and distribution of controlled substances by persons engaged in research. Persons who obtain this authorization are exempt from state prosecution for possession and distribution of controlled substances to the extent of the authorization.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 39; 1985, ch. 262, § 25.

19-03.1-40.
Pending proceedings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 262, § 27.

19-03.1-41.
Continuation of rules.

Any orders and rules promulgated under any law affected by this chapter in effect on July 1, 1971, and not in conflict with it continue in effect until modified, superseded, or repealed.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 41.

19-03.1-42.
Uniformity of interpretation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 154.

19-03.1-43.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 43.

19-03.1-44.
Comprehensive status and trends report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 217, § 1; 2007, ch. 75, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 366, § 6, effective February 23, 2017.

19-03.1-45.
Drug abuse assessment and treatment — Presentence investigation — Certified drug abuse treatment programs. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

If a person has pled guilty or has been found guilty of a felony violation of subsection 7 of section 19-03.1-23, if that person has not previously pled guilty or been found guilty of any offense involving the use, possession, manufacture, or delivery of a controlled substance or of any other felony offense of this or another state or the federal government, the court shall impose a period of probation up to the length authorized under section 12.1-32-06.1 with a suspended execution of a sentence of imprisonment, a sentence to probation, or an order deferring imposition of sentence.

Upon a plea or finding of guilt of a person subject to subsection 1, the court shall order a presentence investigation to be conducted by the department. The presentence investigation must include a drug and alcohol evaluation conducted by a licensed addiction counselor.

If the licensed addiction counselor recommends treatment, the court shall require the person to participate in an addiction program licensed by the department of human services as a condition of the probation. The court shall commit the person to treatment through a licensed addiction program until determined suitable for discharge by the court. The term of treatment may not exceed eighteen months and may include an aftercare plan. During the commitment and while subject to probation, the department shall supervise the person.

If the person fails to participate in, or has a pattern of intentional conduct that demonstrates the person’s refusal to comply with or participate in the treatment program, as established by judicial finding, the person is subject to revocation of the probation. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of section 12.1-32-02, the amount of time participating in the treatment program under this section is not “time spent in custody” and will not be a credit against any sentence to term of imprisonment.

In this section:

“Department” means the department of corrections and rehabilitation; and

“Licensed addiction counselor” is a person licensed pursuant to section 43-45-05.1.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 196, § 1; 2007, ch. 15, § 6; 2015, ch. 171, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 164, § 11, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 187, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 171, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

19-03.1-45.
Drug abuse assessment and treatment — Presentence investigation — Certified drug abuse treatment programs. [Effective September 1, 2022]

If a person has pled guilty or has been found guilty of a felony violation of subsection 7 of section 19-03.1-23, if that person has not previously pled guilty or been found guilty of any offense involving the use, possession, manufacture, or delivery of a controlled substance or of any other felony offense of this or another state or the federal government, the court shall impose a period of probation up to the length authorized under section 12.1-32-06.1 with a suspended execution of a sentence of imprisonment, a sentence to probation, or an order deferring imposition of sentence.

Upon a plea or finding of guilt of a person subject to subsection 1, the court shall order a presentence investigation to be conducted by the department. The presentence investigation must include a drug and alcohol evaluation conducted by a licensed addiction counselor.

If the licensed addiction counselor recommends treatment, the court shall require the person to participate in an addiction program licensed by the department as a condition of the probation. The court shall commit the person to treatment through a licensed addiction program until determined suitable for discharge by the court. The term of treatment may not exceed eighteen months and may include an aftercare plan. During the commitment and while subject to probation, the department shall supervise the person.

If the person fails to participate in, or has a pattern of intentional conduct that demonstrates the person’s refusal to comply with or participate in the treatment program, as established by judicial finding, the person is subject to revocation of the probation. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of section 12.1-32-02, the amount of time participating in the treatment program under this section is not “time spent in custody” and will not be a credit against any sentence to term of imprisonment.

In this section:

“Department” means the department of corrections and rehabilitation; and

“Licensed addiction counselor” is a person licensed pursuant to section 43-45-05.1.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 196, § 1; 2007, ch. 15, § 6; 2015, ch. 171, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 164, § 11, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 187, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 86, effective September 1, 2022.

19-03.1-46.
Bail — Additional conditions of release.

A court shall impose as a condition of release or bail that an individual who has been arrested upon a felony violation of this chapter or chapter 19-03.4 not use a controlled substance without a valid prescription from a licensed medical practitioner and that the individual submit to a medical examination or other reasonable random testing for the purpose of determining the person’s use of a controlled substance. The court shall order the frequency of the random testing and the location at which random testing must occur. The court shall provide notice to the selected provider of the required examination or testing. The provider shall notify the court if the individual fails to appear for the examination or testing. The testing must be at the individual’s own cost. Submission of an individual to a medical examination or other reasonable random testing as a condition for release is not required if the court makes a specific finding on the record that:

The individual has not been arrested for a felony offense relating to the use, possession, manufacture, or delivery of methamphetamine;

The individual will appear as required by the court and will comply with all conditions of release without submission to an examination or testing; and

Not imposing examination or testing as a condition of release will pose no danger to the individual or to the community.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 197, § 1.